New Mexico, session 2026, HB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Economic Development Department Act, Section 9-15-4.2 NMSA 1978, is enacted to read: "9-15-4.2. [NEW MATERIAL] PLANNING BUREAU--ESTABLISHED--DUTIES.-- A. The "planning bureau" is established in the economic development division of the department to address issues relating to the state's growth and development and to help coordinate the state's use of land, facilities and resources. B. The planning bureau shall: (1) in collaboration with the department of transportation, the department of environment, the New Mexico mortgage finance authority, the state's regional planning commissions created pursuant to the Regional Planning Act and the state's three regional housing authorities, prepare a comprehensive plan to address future development in the state, with emphasis on: (a) creation of jobs and housing and transportation needs and linkages; and (b) interagency and intergovernmental collaboration and coordination; (2) update the development plan every three years or more frequently, as deemed necessary by the bureau; and (3) collaborate with an Indian nation, tribe or pueblo on matters relating to development and planning upon request of the Indian nation, tribe or pueblo." SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the economic development department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years for staffing the planning bureau of the economic development division of the economic development department. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. - 3 -